en: E1400, Dextrin
xx: E1400
ar: E1400, دكسترين
be: E1400, Дэкстрын
bg: E1400, Декстрин
bs: E1400, Dekstrin
ca: E1400, Dextrina
cs: E1400, Dextrin, Dextriny
da: E1400, dekstrin, dextrin
de: E1400, Dextrine, Weizendextrin, Dextrin, Stärkegummi
el: E1400, Δεξτρίνες
es: E1400, Dextrina
eu: E1400, Destrina
fa: E1400, دکسترین
fi: E1400, Dekstriini, Dekstriiniä
fr: E1400, Dextrines, amidon torréfié, Gomme d'amidon, dextrine
ga: E1400, Deistrin
gl: E1400, Dextrina
hr: E1400, Dekstrin
hu: E1400, Dextrin
id: E1400, Dekstrin
io: E1400, Dextrino
it: E1400, Destrina, Destrine
ja: E1400, デキストリン
kk: E1400, Декстриндер
ko: E1400, 덱스트린
ky: E1400, Декстриндер
ml: E1400, ഡെക്സ്ട്രിൻ
mn: E1400, Декстрин
nb: E1400, Dekstrin
nl: E1400, Dextrine
pl: E1400, E1400, Dekstryny, Dekstryna
pt: E1400, Dextrina
ro: E1400, Dextrină
ru: E1400, декстрин
sh: E1400, Dekstrin
sk: E1400, Dextríny
sr: E1400, Dekstrin
sv: E1400, Dextrin
tr: E1400, Dekstrin
uk: E1400, Декстрин
uz: E1400, Dekstrinlar
vi: E1400, Dextrin
zh: E1400, 糊精

en: E1401, Acid-treated modified starch
xx: E1401
ar: E1401, نشا معالج بالحمض
az: E1401, Turşu ilə işlənmiş modifikasiya olunmuş nişasta
bg: E1401, Kиселинно обработено модифицирано нишесте
ca: E1401, Midó modificat tractat amb àcid
cs: E1401, Škrob upravený kyselinou
da: E1401, Syrebehandlet modificeret stivelse
de: E1401, säurebehandelte Stärke, säurebehandelte modifizierte Stärke
el: E1401, Τροποποιημένο άμυλο επεξεργασμένο με οξύ
es: E1401, Almidón modificado tratado con ácido
et: E1401, Happe abil töödeldud modifitseeritud tärklis
fi: E1401, Happokäsitelty tärkkelys, Happokäsiteltyä tärkkelystä
fr: E1401, Amidon traité aux acides
hu: E1401, Savval kezelt módosított keményítő
it: E1401, Amido modificato trattato con acido
ja: E1401, 酸処理変性澱粉
ko: E1401, 산처리 변성 전분
lt: E1401, Rūgštimi apdorotas modifikuotas krakmolas
lv: E1401, Ar skābi apstrādāta modificēta ciete
mt: E1401, Lamtu modifikat ittrattat bl-aċidu
nl: E1401, Zuur-behandeld zetmeel
pl: E1401, Skrobia modyfikowana kwasami
pt: E1401, Amido modificado tratado com ácido
ro: E1401, Amidon modificat tratat cu acid
ru: E1401, обработанный кислотой
sk: E1401, Škrob modifikovaný kyselinou
sl: E1401, S kislino obdelan modificiran škrob
sv: E1401, Syra-behandlad modifierad stärkelse
th: E1401, แป้งดัดแปรที่ผ่านการบำบัดด้วยกรด
tr: E1401, Asitle işlenmiş modifiye nişasta
uk: E1401, Модифікований крохмаль, оброблений кислотою
zh: E1401, 酸处理改性淀粉

en: E1402, Alkaline modified starch
xx: E1402
az: E1402, Qələvi modifikasiya edilmiş nişasta
bg: E1402, Алкално модифицирано нишесте
ca: E1402, Midó modificat alcalí
cs: E1402, Alkalicky modifikovaný škrob
da: E1402, Alkalisk modificeret stivelse
de: E1402, alkalisch modifizierte Stärke
el: E1402, Αλκαλικά τροποποιημένο άμυλο
es: E1402, Almidón modificado alcalino
et: E1402, Leelisega modifitseeritud tärklis
fi: E1402, Alkalikäsitelty tärkkelys, Alkalikäsiteltyä tärkkelystä
fr: E1402, Amidon traité aux alcalis
hu: E1402, Lúggal módosított keményítő
it: E1402, Amido modificato alcalino
ja: E1402, アルカリ変性デンプン
ko: E1402, 알칼리 변성 전분
lt: E1402, Šarmu modifikuotas krakmolas
lv: E1402, Sārmaini modificēta ciete
nl: E1402, Alkali-behandeld zetmeel
pl: E1402, skrobia modyfikowana zasadami
pt: E1402, Amido modificado alcalino
ro: E1402, Amidon modificat alcalin
ru: E1402, Щелочной модифицированный крахмал
sk: E1402, Alkalicky modifikovaný škrob
sl: E1402, Alkalno modificiran škrob
sv: E1402, Alkaliskt modifierad stärkelse
th: E1402, สตาร์ชดัดแปรด้วยด่าง
tr: E1402, Alkali modifiye nişasta
uk: E1402, Лужно-модифікований крохмаль
zh: E1402, 碱改性淀粉

en: E1403, Bleached starch
xx: E1403
ar: E1403, نشا مبيَّض
az: E1403, Ağardılmış nişasta
bg: E1403, Избелен крахмал
ca: E1403, Midó blanquejat
cs: E1403, Bělený škrob
da: E1403, Blegnet stivelse
de: E1403, gebleichte Stärke
el: E1403, Λευκασμένο άμυλο
es: E1403, Almidón blanqueado
et: E1403, Pleegitatud tärklis
fi: E1403, Valkaistu tärkkelys, Valkaistua tärkkelystä
fr: E1403, Amidon blanchi
hu: E1403, Fehérített keményítő
it: E1403, Amido sbiancato
ja: E1403, 漂白されたデンプン
ko: E1403, 표백 전분
lt: E1403, Balintas krakmolas
lv: E1403, Balināta ciete
mt: E1403, Lamtu mġieba
nl: E1403, Gebleekt zetmeel
pl: E1403, Skrobia bielona, skrobia wybielona
pt: E1403, Amido branqueado
ro: E1403, Amidon alb
ru: E1403, Отбеленный крахмал
sk: E1403, Bielené škroby, Bielený škrob
sl: E1403, Beljen škrob
sv: E1403, Blekt stärkelse
th: E1403, แป้งฟอกขาว
tr: E1403, Beyazlatılmış nişasta
uk: E1403, Вибілений крохмаль
zh: E1403, 漂白淀粉

en: E1404, Oxidised starch
xx: E1404
bg: E1404, Окислено нишесте, Окисленото нишесте е нишесте
ca: E1404, Midó oxidat, mido oxidat
cs: E1404, Oxidovaný škrob
da: E1404, Oxideret stivelse, Oxideret stivelse er stivelse
de: E1404, Oxidierte stärke
el: E1404, Οξειδωμενο αμυλο
es: E1404, Almidón oxidado
et: E1404, Oksüdeeritud tärklis
fi: E1404, Hapetettu tärkkelys, Hapetettua tärkkelystä
fr: E1404, Amidon oxydé
hu: E1404, Oxidált keményítő
it: E1404, Amido ossidato
lt: E1404, Oksiduotasis krakmolas
lv: E1404, Oksidētā ciete, Oksidētā ciete ir ciete
mt: E1404, Lamtu ossidat
nl: E1404, Geoxideerd zetmeel
pl: E1404, Skrobia utleniona
pt: E1404, Amido oxidado
ro: E1404, Amidon oxidat
sk: E1404, Oxidovaný škrob
sl: E1404, Oksidirani škrob, oksidirani škrob je škrob
sv: E1404, Oxiderad stärkelse

en: E1405, Enzyme treated starch
xx: E1405
ar: E1405, نشا معالج بالإنزيمات
az: E1405, Enzimlə işlənmiş nişasta
bg: E1405, Ензимно обработен крахмал
ca: E1405, Midó tractat amb enzims
cs: E1405, Enzymaticky modifikovaný škrob
da: E1405, Enzymbehandlet stivelse
de: E1405, Enzymatisch modifizierte Stärke, Enzymatisch behandelte Stärke
el: E1405, Ένζυμο-επεξεργασμένο άμυλο
es: E1405, Almidón tratado con enzimas
et: E1405, Ensüümidega töödeldud tärklis
fi: E1405, Entsyymikäsitelty tärkkelys
fr: E1405, Amidon traité aux enzymes
hu: E1405, Enzimekkel kezelt keményítő
it: E1405, Amido trattato con enzimi
ja: E1405, 酵素処理デンプン
ko: E1405, 효소 처리 전분
lt: E1405, Fermentais apdorotas krakmolas
lv: E1405, Enzīmu apstrādāta ciete
mt: E1405, Lamtu ttrattat bl-enzimi
nl: E1405, Enzymatisch behandeld zetmeel
pl: E1405, Skrobia modyfikowana enzymatycznie
pt: E1405, Amido tratado enzimaticamente
ro: E1405, Amidon tratat cu enzime
sk: E1405, Enzymaticky modifikované škroby
sl: E1405, Škrob obdelan z encimi
sv: E1405, Enzymbehandlad stärkelse
zh: E1405, 酶处理淀粉

en: E1410, Monostarch phosphate
xx: E1410
bg: E1410, Мононишестен фосфат
ca: E1410, Fosfat de monomidó, fosfat de monomido
cs: E1410, Fosforečnan škrobu
da: E1410, Monostivelsephosphat
de: E1410, Monostärkephosphat
el: E1410, Δισοξινο φωσφορικο αμυλο
es: E1410, Fosfato de monoalmidón
et: E1410, Monotärklisfosfaat
fi: E1410, Monotärkkelysfosfaatti, Monotärkkelysfosfaattia
fr: E1410, Phosphate d'amidon
hu: E1410, Monokeményítő-foszfát
it: E1410, Fosfato di monoamido
lt: E1410, Monokrakmolo fosfatas
lv: E1410, Monocietes fosfāts
mt: E1410, Fosfat monoammidiku
nl: E1410, Monozetmeelfosfaat
pl: E1410, Fosforan monoskrobiowy
pt: E1410, Fosfato de monoamido
ro: E1410, Fosfat de amidon
sk: E1410, Fosforečnanový monoester škrobu
sl: E1410, Monoškrobni fosfat, monoškrobni fosfat je škrob
sv: E1410, Monostärkelsefosfat

en: E1411, Distarch glycerol
xx: E1411
bg: E1411, Глицерил дистарч
cs: E1411, Glycerol distarch
da: E1411, Distarch glycerol
de: E1411, Distärkeglycerol
el: E1411, Γλυκερόλη διστάρχη
es: E1411, Glicerol de distarco
et: E1411, Distärküülglütserool
fi: E1411, Distärkkelysglyseroli, Ditärkkelysglyserolia
fr: E1411, Glycérol de diamidon, Glycérol de distarque
hu: E1411, Dikeményítő-glycerol
it: E1411, Glicerolo di distarch
lt: E1411, Distarch glikerolis
lv: E1411, Distarča glicerols
mt: E1411, Gliċerolu distarċ
nl: E1411, Distarch glycerol
pl: E1411, glicerol diskrobiowy, Gliceryd distarcho
pt: E1411, Glicerol de distarca
ro: E1411, Glicerol de distarce
sk: E1411, Glycerol distarch
sl: E1411, Glicerol distarč
sv: E1411, Distärkelseglycerol

en: E1412, Distarch phosphate
xx: E1412
bg: E1412, Динишестен фосфат
ca: E1412, Fosfat de dimidó, fosfat de dimido
cs: E1412, Zesíťovaný fosforečnan škrobu
da: E1412, Distivelsephosphat, Distivelsephosphat er stivelse
de: E1412, Distärkephosphat
el: E1412, Οξινο φωσφορικο αμυλο
es: E1412, Fosfato de dialmidón
et: E1412, Ditärklisfosfaat, Ditärklisfosfaat on tärklis
fi: E1412, Ditärkkelysfosfaatti, Ditärkkelysfosfaattia
fr: E1412, Phosphate de diamidon
hr: E1412, diškrob fosfat
hu: E1412, Dikeményítő-foszfát
it: E1412, Fosfato di diamido
lt: E1412, Dikrakmolo fosfatas
lv: E1412, Dicietes fosfāts, Dicietes fosfāts ir ciete
mt: E1412, Fosfat diammidiku
nl: E1412, Dizetmeelfosfaat
pl: E1412, Fosforan diskrobiowy
pt: E1412, Fosfato de diamido
ro: E1412, Fosfat de diamidon
sk: E1412, Diškrobfosfát
sl: E1412, Diškrobni fosfat, diškrobni fosfat je škrob
sv: E1412, Distärkelsefosfat

en: E1413, Phosphated distarch phosphate
xx: E1413
bg: E1413, Фосфориран динишестен фосфат
ca: E1413, Fosfat de dimidó fosfatat
cs: E1413, Fosforečnan zesíťovaného fosforečnanu škrobu
da: E1413, Phosphateret distivelsephosphat
de: E1413, Phosphatiertes distärkephosphat
el: E1413, Φωσφορυλιωμενο οξινο φωσφορικο αμυλο
es: E1413, Fosfato de dialmidón fosfatado
et: E1413, Fosfaaditud ditärklisfosfaat
fi: E1413, Fosfatoitu ditärkkelysfosfaatti, Fosfatoitua ditärkkelysfosfaattia
fr: E1413, Phosphate de diamidon phosphaté
hu: E1413, Foszfatált dikeményítő-foszfát
it: E1413, Fosfato di diamido fosfatato
lt: E1413, Fosfatuotas dikrakmolo fosfatas
lv: E1413, Fosfatētais dicietes fosfāts
mt: E1413, Fosfat diammidiku ffosfat
nl: E1413, Gefosfateerd dizetmeelfosfaat
pl: E1413, Fosforanowany fosforan diskrobiowy
pt: E1413, Fosfato de diamido fosfatado
ro: E1413, Fosfat de diamidon fosfatat
sk: E1413, Fosfátový diškrobfosfát
sl: E1413, Fosforiliran diškrobni fosfat
sv: E1413, Fosfaterat distärkelsefosfat

en: E1414, Acetylated distarch phosphate
xx: E1414
bg: E1414, Ацетилиран динишестен фосфат
ca: E1414, Fosfat de dimidó acetilat
cs: E1414, Acetylovaný zesíťovaný fosforečnan škrobu
da: E1414, Acetyleret distivelsephosphat
de: E1414, acetyliertes Distärkephosphat
el: E1414, Ακετυλιωμενο οξινο φωσφορικο αμυλο
es: E1414, Fosfato de dialmidón acetilado
et: E1414, Atsetüülitud ditärklisfosfaat
fi: E1414, Asetyloitu ditärkkelysfosfaatti, Asetyloitua ditärkkelysfosfaattia
fr: E1414, Phosphate de diamidon acétylé
hu: E1414, Acetilezett dikeményítő-foszfát
it: E1414, Fosfato di diamido acetilato
lt: E1414, Acetilintas dikrakmolo fosfatas
lv: E1414, Acetilētas dicietes fosfāts
mt: E1414, Fosfat diammidiku aċetilat
nl: E1414, Geacetyleerd dizetmeelfosfaat
pl: E1414, Acetylowany fosforan diskrobiowy
pt: E1414, Fosfato de diamido acetilado
ro: E1414, Fosfat de diamidon acetilat
sk: E1414, Acetylovaný diškrobfosfát
sl: E1414, Acetiliran diškrobni fosfat
sv: E1414, Acetylerat distärkelsefosfat

en: E1420, Acetylated starch
xx: E1420
bg: E1420, Ацетилирано нишесте
ca: E1420, Midó acetilat, mido acetilat
cs: E1420, Acetylovaný škrob
da: E1420, Acetyleret stivelse
de: E1420, acetylierte Stärke
el: E1420, Ακετυλιωμενο αμυλο
es: E1420, Almidón acetilado
et: E1420, Atsetüülitud tärklis
fi: E1420, Asetyloitu tärkkelys, Asetyloitua tärkkelystä
fr: E1420, Amidon acétylé
hu: E1420, Acetilezett keményítő
it: E1420, Amido acetilato
lt: E1420, Acetilintas krakmolas
lv: E1420, Acetilētā ciete
mt: E1420, Lamtu aċetilat
nl: E1420, Geacetyleerd zetmeel
pl: E1420, Skrobia acetylowana
pt: E1420, Amido acetilado
ro: E1420, Amidon acetilat
sk: E1420, Acetylovaný škrob
sl: E1420, Acetilirani škrob
sv: E1420, Stärkelseacetat

en: E1421, Acetylated starch, mono starch acetate, Starch acetate esterified with vinyl acetate
xx: E1421
bg: E1421, Ацетилирано нишесте, моно нишесте ацетат, Нишесте ацетат естерифициран с винил ацетат
cs: E1421, Acetylovaný škrob, mono škrobový acetát, Škrob acetát esterifikovaný s vinylacetátem
da: E1421, Acetyleret stivelse, mono stivelseacetat, Stivelseacetat esterificeret med vinylacetat
de: E1421, Acetylierte Stärke, Mono-Stärkeacetat, Stärkeacetat esterifiziert mit Vinylacetat
el: E1421, Ακετυλιωμένο άμυλο, μονο αμυλο οξικο ασετατ, Άμυλο οξικο ασετατ εστεριφικοποιημένο με αιθυλοακετατ
es: E1421, Almidón acetilado, mono acetato de almidón, Acetato de almidón esterificado con acetato de vinilo
et: E1421, Atsetüülitud tärklis, mono tärklise atsetaat, Tärklise atsetaat vinüülatsetaadiga esterifitseeritud
fi: E1421, Asetyloitu tärkkelys, mono tärkkelysasetaatti, Tärkkelysasetaatti vinyyliasetaatilla esteröity
fr: E1421, Amidon acétylé à acétate de vinyle, Amidon acétylé, mono-acétate d'amidon, Acétate d'amidon estérifié à l'acétate de vinyle
hu: E1421, Acetilezett keményítő, mono keményítő-acetát, Keményítő-acetát vinil-acetáttal észterezett
it: E1421, Amido acetilato, mono acetato di amido, Acetato di amido esterificato con acetato di vinile
lt: E1421, Acetilintas krakmolas, mono krakmolo acetatas, Krakmolo acetatas esterifikuotas vinilo acetatu
lv: E1421, Acetilēta ciete, mono cietes acetāts, Cietes acetāts vinilacetātā esterificēts
mt: E1421, Lamtu aċetilat, mono aċetat tal-lamtu, Aċetat tal-lamtu esterifikat b'acetat tal-vinil
nl: E1421, Geacetyleerd zetmeel, mono zetmeelacetaat, Zetmeelacetaat geësterificeerd met vinylacetaat
pl: E1421, Skrobia acetylowana, mono octan skrobi, Octan skrobi estryfikowany octanem winylu
pt: E1421, Amido acetilado, mono acetato de amido, Acetato de amido esterificado com acetato de vinilo
ro: E1421, Amidon acetilat, mono acetat de amidon, Acetat de amidon esterificat cu acetat de vinil
sk: E1421, Acetylovaný škrob, mono škrobový acetát, Škrob acetát esterifikovaný s vinylacetátom
sl: E1421, Acetilirani škrob, mono škrobni acetat, Škrobni acetat esterificiran z vinil acetatom
sv: E1421, Acetylerat stärkelse, mono stärkelseacetat, Stärkelseacetat esterifierat med vinylacetat

en: E1422, Acetylated distarch adipate
xx: E1422
bg: E1422, Ацетилиран динишестен адипат
ca: E1422, Adipat de dimidó acetilat
cs: E1422, Acetylovaný zesíťovaný adipan škrobu
da: E1422, Acetyleret distivelseadipat
de: E1422, acetyliertes Distärkeadipat
el: E1422, Ακετυλιωμενο οξινο αδιπικο αμυλο
es: E1422, adipato de dialmidón acetilado, Adipato de almidón acetilado
et: E1422, Atsetüülitud ditärk lisadipaat
fi: E1422, Asetyloitu ditärkkelysadipaatti, Asetyloitua ditärkkelysadipaattia
fr: E1422, Adipate de diamidon acétylé, amidon modifié E1422
hr: E1422
hu: E1422, Acetilezett dikeményítő-adipát
it: E1422, Adipato di diamido acetilato
lt: E1422, Acetilintas dikrakmolo adipatas
lv: E1422, Acetilētais dicietes adipāts
mt: E1422, Adipat diammidiku aċetilat
nb: E1422, Acetylert distivelseasdipat
nl: E1422, Geacetyleerd dizetmeeladipaat
pl: E1422, Acetylowany adypinian diskrobiowy
pt: E1422, Adipato de diamido acetilado
ro: E1422, Adipat de diamidon acetilat
ru: E1422, Дикрахмаладипат ацетилированный, ацетилированный дикрахмаладипат
sk: E1422, Acetylovaný diškrobadipát
sl: E1422, Acetiliran diškrobni adipat
sv: E1422, Acetylerat distärkelseadipat

en: E1423, Acetylated distarch glycerol
xx: E1423
bg: E1423, Ацетилиран динишестен глицерол
cs: E1423, Acetylovaný škrobový glycerol
da: E1423, Acetyleret distivelseglycerol
de: E1423, Acetyliertes Distärkeglycerin
el: E1423, Ακετυλιωμένος δισταρχογλυκερόλη
es: E1423, Glicerol de dialmidón acetilado
et: E1423, Atsetüülitud ditärk lisglütserool
fi: E1423, Asetyloitu ditärkkelysglyseroli, Asetyloitua ditärkkelysglyserolia
fr: E1423, Glycérol de diamidon acétylé, Glycérol acétylé de diamidon
hu: E1423, Acetilezett dikeményítő-glicerin
it: E1423, Glicerolo di diamido acetilato
lt: E1423, Acetilintas dikrakmolo gliukerolis
lv: E1423, Acetilētais dicietes glicerīns
mt: E1423, Gliċerolu diammidiku aċetilat
nl: E1423, Geacetyleerd dizetmeelglycerol
pl: E1423, Acetylowany glicerol diskrobiowy
pt: E1423, Glicerol de distarca acetilado
ro: E1423, Glicerol de amidon acetilat
sk: E1423, Acetylovaný škrobový glycerol
sl: E1423, Acetiliran diškrobni glicerol
sv: E1423, Acetylerad distärkelseglycerol

en: E1430, Distarch glycerine
xx: E1430
bg: E1430, Дистарч глицерин
cs: E1430, Glycerin distarch
da: E1430, Distarch glycerin
de: E1430, Distärkeglycerin
el: E1430, Γλυκερίνη διστάρχη
es: E1430, Glicerina de distarco
et: E1430, Distarch glütseriin
fi: E1430, Tärkkelysglyseriini
fr: E1430, Diamidon glycériné, Glycéride de distarque
hu: E1430, Dikeményítő-glicerin
it: E1430, Glicerina di distarco
lt: E1430, Distarch gliukerinas
lv: E1430, Distarča glicerīns
mt: E1430, Gliċerina diżtarċa
nl: E1430, Distarch glycerine
pl: E1430, Gliceryna distarchowa
pt: E1430, Glicerina de distarco
ro: E1430, Glicerina de distarciu
sk: E1430, Glycerín distarch
sl: E1430, Glicerol distarča
sv: E1430, Distärkelseglycerin

en: E1440, Hydroxypropyl starch
xx: E1440
bg: E1440, Хидроксипропил нишесте
ca: E1440, Midó hidroxipropilat
cs: E1440, Hydroxypropylether škrobu
da: E1440, Hydroxypropylstivelse
de: E1440, Hydroxypropylstärke
el: E1440, Υδροξυπροπυλαμυλο
es: E1440, Hidroxipropilalmidón
et: E1440, Hüdroksüpropüültärklis
fi: E1440, Hydroksipropyylitärkkelys, Hydroksipropyylitärkkelystä
fr: E1440, Amidon hydroxypropyle, Amidon hydroxypropylé
hu: E1440, Hidroxi-propil-keményítő
it: E1440, Amido idrossipropilato
lt: E1440, Hidroksipropilkrakmolas
lv: E1440, Hidroksipropilciete, Hidroksipropilciete ir ciete
mt: E1440, Lamtu idrossipropiliku
nl: E1440, Hydroxypropylzetmeel
pl: E1440, Hydroksypropyloskrobia
pt: E1440, Hidroxipropilamido
ro: E1440, Hidroxipropilamidon
sk: E1440, Hydroxypropylškrob
sl: E1440, Hidroksipropil škrob, hidroksipropil škrob je škrob
sv: E1440, Hydroxipropylstärkelse

en: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerine
xx: E1441
az: E1441, Hidroksi propil nişasta qliserin
bg: E1441, Хидрокси пропил дистарх глицерин
ca: E1441, Glicerin de dialmidó hidroxipropil
cs: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerin
da: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerin
de: E1441, Hydroxypropyldistärkeglycerin
el: E1441, Υδροξυ προπυλ διστάρχη γλυκερίνη
es: E1441, Glicerol de dialmidón hidroxipropil
et: E1441, Hüdroksüpropüül-ditselluloosglütserin
fi: E1441, Hydroksi propyyli distärkkelys glyseriini
fr: E1441, Glycérine de diamidon hydroxypropylé, hydroxy-propylique
hu: E1441, Hidroxi propil di keményítő glicerin
it: E1441, Glicerolo di dialmid idrossipropilico
ja: E1441, ヒドロキシプロピル二澱粉グリセリン
ko: E1441, 하이드록시 프로필 디스타치 글리세린
lt: E1441, Hidroksi propil distarch glicerinas
lv: E1441, Hidroksi propil distarha glicerīns
mt: E1441, Gliċerol tad-dijamiżella idrossi propil
nl: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerin
pl: E1441, Hydroksypropylowy glicerin diskrobiowy
pt: E1441, Hidroxi propil distar glicerin
ro: E1441, Hidroxi propil distar glicerin
ru: E1441, Гидрокси пропил дистарх глицерин
sk: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerin
sl: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glicerin
sv: E1441, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerin
tr: E1441, Hidroksi propil distar gliserol

en: E1442, Hydroxypropyl distarch phosphate
xx: E1442
bg: E1442, Хидроксипропил динишестен фосфат
ca: E1442, Fosfat de dimidó hidroxipropilat
cs: E1442, Hydroxypropylether zesíťovaného fosforečnanu škrobu
da: E1442, Hydroxypropyldistivelsephosphat
de: E1442, Hydroxypropyldistärkephosphat
el: E1442, Οξινο φωσφορικο υδροξυπροπυλαμυλο
es: E1442, Fosfato de dialmidón hidroxipropilado
et: E1442, Hüdroksüpropüülditärklisfosfaat
fi: E1442, Hydroksipropyyliditärkkelysfosfaatti, Hydroksipropyyliditärkkelysfosfaattia
fr: E1442, Phosphate de diamidon hydroxypropyle, Phosphate de diamidon hydroxypropylé
hu: E1442, Hidroxi-propil-dikeményítő-foszfát
it: E1442, Fosfato di diamido idrossipropilato
lt: E1442, Hidroksipropildikrakmolo fosfatas
lv: E1442, Hidroksipropildicietes fosfāts
mt: E1442, Fosfat diammid idrossipropiliku
nl: E1442, Hydroxypropyldizetmeelfosfaat
pl: E1442, Hydroksypropylofosforan diskrobiowy
pt: E1442, Fosfato de hidroxipropildiamido
ro: E1442, Fosfat de diamidon hidroxipropilic
ru: E1442, дикрахмалфосфат оксипропилированный
sk: E1442, Hydroxypropyl diškrobfosfát
sl: E1442, Hidroksipropil diškrobni fosfat
sv: E1442, Hydroxipropyldistärkelsefosfat

en: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
xx: E1443
az: E1443, Hidroksi propil nişasta gliserol
bg: E1443, Хидрокси пропил дистарх глицерол
ca: E1443, Glicerol de dialmidó hidroxipropil
cs: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
da: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
de: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
el: E1443, Υδροξυ προπυλ διστάρχη γλυκερόλη
es: E1443, Glicerol de dialmidón hidroxipropilo
et: E1443, Hüdroksüpropüül-ditselluloosglütserool
fi: E1443, Hydroksipropyyliditärkkelysglyseroli, Hydroksipropyyliditärkkelysglyserolia
fr: E1443, Glycérol de diamidon hydroxypropyle
hu: E1443, Hidroxi-propil-dikeményítő-glicerol
it: E1443, Glicerolo di distarch idrossipropilico
ja: E1443, ヒドロキシプロピル二澱粉グリセロール
ko: E1443, 하이드록시 프로필 디스타치 글리세롤
lt: E1443, Hidroksi propil distarch glicerolis
lv: E1443, Hidroksi propil distarha glicerols
nl: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
pl: E1443, Hydroksypropylowy glicerol diskrobiowy
pt: E1443, Glicerol de distarca hidroxipropil
ro: E1443, Glicerol de distarce hidroxipropil
ru: E1443, Гидрокси пропил дистарх глицерол
sk: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
sl: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glicerol
sv: E1443, Hydroxy propyl distarch glycerol
tr: E1443, Hidroksi propil distarş gliserol